Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1802
Permit required.

Every owner, except dealers or manufacturers, of a camper unit which is located within this state for a period of thirty days or more shall obtain a permit therefor in the manner prescribed by sections 60-1801 to 60-1808. No refund of the permit fee shall be made after a permit has been issued. The permit shall not be transferred to a new owner, and in case of transfer of ownership of such camper unit, a new permit must be obtained in the same manner as the original permit was obtained.

Laws 1969, c. 627, § 2, p. 2526.